Louisiana, session 2026, HB203.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 40:1104(B)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
6 §1104. Uterine Fibroids Commission
7 * * *
8 B. The commission shall be comprised of the following members:
9 * * *
10 (3) One member from the Christus Health System Xavier Ochsner College
11 of Medicine.
12 * * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.